Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-806
Formation of district; petitioner; appeal; procedure.

The petitioner may appeal from the decision of the board dismissing the petitioner's petition, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1949, c. 196, § 6(1), p. 575;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 40;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 111.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.